Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 5 Glass Installations

8-2-90 through 8-2-95.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 151, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1971, p. 901, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1231, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 946, § 1/HB 368, effective May 6, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 946, § 1/HB 368 repealed and reserved this part, effective May 6, 2015.